Massachusetts, session 194th, S2920.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. (a) There shall be a task force established to conduct a comprehensive study
on the most effective and efficient means of implementing a cistern program across the
commonwealth. The task force shall study the costs, alternatives for developing water storage
cisterns for areas of the state with insufficient water supplies for fire suppression, prioritizing
cistern locations at the urban-wildland interface and in rural communities where water resources
for use by the fire service to combat fires are limited.
(b) The task force shall consist of 7 members that shall include: (i) the state fire marshal
or their designee, who shall serve as chair; (ii) the director of the Massachusetts emergency
management agency or their designee; (iii) the commissioner of the department of environmental
protection or their designee; (iv) 1 member of the Board of Building Standards and Regulations;
(v) the chief fire warden of the department of conservation and recreation; (vi) a representative
from the Fire Chiefs’ Association of Massachusetts; (vii) 1 rural firefighter, (viii) additionally
there shall be 2 non voting advisory members, 1 appointed by the Speaker of the House of
Representatives and 1 appointed by the President of the Senate.
of 2

(c) The study shall include, but not be limited to: (i) input and recommendations from the
appropriate municipal representatives from communities with documented water access
challenges for fire suppression; (ii) evaluating the optimal placement of cisterns based on fire
risk and water access; (iii) ensuring that any cistern deployment strategy is based on data-driven
decision-making and informed by industry best practices, and codes and standards set for in
NFPA 1141 and NFPA 1142; (vi) opportunities for cistern alternatives, including dry hydrants
and related infrastructure; (vii) the cost for the construction, installation and maintenance of 10
water storage cisterns, dry hydrants and related water infrastructure per year, at the wildland
urban interface and rural and urban communities throughout the commonwealth.
(d) The task force shall prepare a report on its activities and on any findings and
recommendations for a statewide firefighting cistern strategy including, but not limited to: (i)
identifying priority areas for installation; (ii) potential cost and funding sources; and (iii)
regulatory or legislative changes needed to facilitate implementation. The report shall be
submitted to the: (i) secretary of the executive office of public safety and security; (ii) joint
committee on public safety and homeland security; and (iii) offices of the house and senate clerk
not later than December 31, 2026.
of 2